Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20268-2737
Consent order.

The director may enter into a consent order at any time with a person to resolve a matter arising under the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act or a rule or regulation adopted and promulgated or order issued under the act. A consent order shall be signed by the person to whom the order is issued or by the person's authorized representative, and shall indicate agreement with the terms contained in the order. A consent order may provide that it does not constitute an admission by a person that the act or a rule or regulation adopted and promulgated or an order issued under the act has been violated.

Laws 2013, LB616, § 37;

Laws 2019, LB355, § 1;

Laws 2021, LB363, § 22;

Laws 2025, LB474, § 42.